California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(h) Juvenile grants shall not be awarded by the Board of State and Community Corrections without the concurrence of the office. All juvenile justice grant administration functions in the Board of State and Community Corrections shall be moved to the office no later than January 1, 2025. The allocation of funds dedicated to the Local Revenue Fund 2011 and its accounts, subaccounts, and special accounts shall be consistent with Chapter 6.3
 (commencing with Section 30025) of Division 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(i) The Office of Youth and Community Restoration shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for all employees, prospective employees, contractors, subcontractors, and volunteers requiring direct contact with young people in juvenile facilities or access to criminal offender record information, as defined by Section 11075 of the Penal Code, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- or federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(j) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the Office of Youth and Community Restoration may establish
 grantmaking programs with the funding designated in the Budget Act of 2021 and with other funding available for that purpose by means of information notices or other similar instructions, without taking further regulatory action.

(k) The Office of Youth and Community Restoration may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis for purposes of implementing those activities funded by the Budget Act of 2021 and other funding available for these purposes. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section are exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Administrative Manual, and the State Contracting Manual, and are exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department
 of General Services.

(l) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 385, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 12.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 13 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

2200.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2021, there is in the California Health and Human Services Agency the Office of Youth and Community Restoration.

(b) The office’s mission is to promote trauma-responsive, culturally informed services for youth involved in the juvenile justice system that support the youths’ successful transition into adulthood and help them become responsible, thriving, and engaged members of their communities.

(c) The office shall have the responsibility and authority to do all of the following:

(1) Once data becomes available as a result of the plan developed to Section 13015 of the Penal Code, develop a report on youth
 outcomes in the juvenile justice system.

(2) Identify policy recommendations for improved outcomes and integrated programs and services to best support delinquent youth.

(3) Identify and disseminate best practices to help inform rehabilitative and restorative youth practices, including education, diversion, re-entry, religious and victims’ services.

(4) Provide technical assistance as requested to develop and expand local youth diversion opportunities to meet the varied needs of the delinquent youth population, including but not limited to sex offender, substance abuse, and mental health treatment.

(5) Report annually on the work of the Office of Youth and Community Restoration.

(6) (A) Develop an annual report on chronic absenteeism rates in juvenile court schools at juvenile facilities. The office may work with the State Department of Education and county offices of education to include data for all juvenile court schools.

(B) Subject to available funding, investigate the reasons for absenteeism at juvenile court schools with chronic absenteeism rates of 15 percent or more, including, but not limited to, an investigation of whether the juvenile facility has provided sufficient staff to support transportation and access to educational services and whether policies or practices have been implemented that withhold educational services from youth as a means of individual or group punishment. The office shall include a summary of the findings of any investigation it conducts in the annual report.

(C) Subject to available
 funding, if, after an investigation, the office determines that insufficient staff, transportation, punitive policies, or any policies under the juvenile facility’s control are contributing to chronic absenteeism rates, provide technical assistance to ameliorate the identified causes of the chronic absenteeism.

(d) The office shall have an ombudsperson, who has the authority to do all of the following:

(1) Investigate complaints from youth.

(2) Decide, in its discretion, whether to investigate complaints from youth who are detained in the, or committed to, juvenile facilities, families, staff, and others about harmful conditions or practices, violations of laws and regulations governing facilities, and circumstances presenting an emergency situation, or refer complaints to another body for investigation.

(3) Publish and provide regular reports to the Legislature about complaints received and subsequent findings and actions taken, pursuant to Section 2200.5.

(4) Have access to, and make copies of any record of a local agency, and contractors with local agencies, including, but not limited to, all juvenile facility records, at all times, except personnel records legally required to be kept confidential. Access to records shall be in accordance with existing law and rules of court governing juvenile confidentiality and all other applicable laws.

(5) Meet or communicate privately with any youth, individually or in groups of youth. Meet or communicate privately with any personnel, or volunteer in a juvenile facility
 and premises within the control of a county or local agency, or a contractor with a county or local agency, and interview any relevant witnesses. The ombudsperson may interview sworn probation personnel in accordance with applicable federal and state law, local probation department policies, and collective bargaining agreements. The ombudsperson shall be granted access to youth at all times, and may take notes, audio or video recording, or photographs during the meeting or communication with youth, to the extent not otherwise prohibited by applicable federal or state law. The ombudsperson shall be permitted to carry with them and use the equipment necessary to document the meeting or communication with youth as described in this section, to the extent not otherwise prohibited by applicable federal or state law. This equipment includes, but is not limited to, state-issued computers, audio, or video recording devices, cameras, or technology providing the ombudsperson internet
 access. Access shall be in accordance with existing law and rules of court governing juvenile confidentiality and all other applicable laws.

(6) Disseminate information and provide training and technical assistance to youth who are involved in the juvenile justice system, including by providing training to currently incarcerated youth as individuals or in a group, in a private setting. Disseminate information and provide training and technical assistance to social workers, probation officers, tribal child welfare agencies, child welfare organizations, children’s and youth advocacy groups, consumer and service provider organizations, and other interested parties on the rights of youth involved in the juvenile justice system and the services provided by the ombudsperson. The rights shall include rights set forth in
 federal and state law and regulations for youth detained in or committed to juvenile justice facilities. The information shall include methods of contacting the ombudsperson and notification that conversations with the office may be disclosed to other persons, as necessary to adequately investigate and resolve a complaint.

(7) Access, visit, and observe juvenile facilities and premises within the control of a county, or local agency, or a contractor with a county, or local agency, serving youth involved in the juvenile justice system. The ombudsperson shall be granted access to the facilities at any time with or without prior notice.

(8) For purposes of this section, “record” means documents, papers, memoranda, logs, reports, letters, calendars, schedules, notes, files, drawings, grievances or
 complaints, and electronic content, including, but not limited to, videos, photographs, blogs, video blogs, instant and text messages, email, or other items developed or received under law or in connection with the transaction of official business, but does not include material that is protected by privilege.

(9) Ombudsperson staff shall conduct a site visit to every juvenile facility and premises within the control of a county or local agency, or a contractor with a county or local agency, no less frequently than once per year.

(e) The Division of the Ombudsperson of the Office of Youth and Community Restoration shall design posters and provide the posters to each juvenile facility operator subject to Section 224.72. These posters shall include the toll-free telephone number of the Ombudsperson of the Office of Youth and Community Restoration.

(f) Consistent with Chapter 17.5 (commencing with Section 7290) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, on or before July 1, 2023, the Office of Youth and Community Restoration shall ensure the listing of rights and posters described in this section are translated into Spanish and other languages as determined necessary and distribute to each juvenile facility operator.

(g) (1) The Office of Youth and Community Restoration shall evaluate the efficacy of local programs being utilized for realigned youth. No later than July 1, 2025, the office shall report its findings to the Governor and the Legislature.

(2) To meet the need to monitor and evaluate local responses for youth realigned to counties from the Division of Juvenile Justice, the Office of Youth and Community Restoration shall
 collect the data described in this paragraph not less frequently than two times per year. Commencing no later than April 1, 2025, for the reporting period from July 1, 2024, through December 31, 2024, and no later than October 1, 2025, for the reporting period from January 1, 2025, through June 30, 2025, and on this schedule every six months thereafter through October 1, 2029, county probation departments shall provide the office with the data described in this paragraph in a format designated by the office. The office shall publish a report of state and county findings not less frequently than annually. The submissions by county probation departments to the office shall include all of the following, disaggregated by gender, age, and race or ethnicity:

(A) Number of youth and their most serious commitment offense, if known, who are under the county’s supervision who are committed to a secure youth treatment facility, including youth committed
 to secure youth treatment facilities in another county.

(B) Number of individual youth in the county who were adjudicated for an offense pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 707 of this code or Section 290.008 of the Penal Code.

(C) Number of youth, including their commitment offense or offenses, if known, transferred from a secure youth treatment facility to a less restrictive program under the terms and provisions of subdivision (f) of Section 875, disaggregated by program description, as defined by the office.

(D) Number of youth for whom a hearing to transfer jurisdiction to an adult criminal court was held, and the number of youth whose jurisdiction was transferred to adult criminal court.

(3) The reporting and data collection provisions of
 paragraph (2) shall become inoperative on January 1, 2030.

(4) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), for the purposes of paragraph (2), the office may, if it deems it appropriate, implement, interpret, or make specific paragraph (2) by means of written guidelines or similar instructions from the office.

(h) Juvenile grants shall not be awarded by the Board of State and Community Corrections without the concurrence of the office. All juvenile justice grant administration functions in the Board of State and Community Corrections shall be moved to the office no later than January 1, 2025. The allocation of funds dedicated to the Local Revenue Fund 2011 and its accounts, subaccounts, and special accounts shall be consistent with Chapter 6.3
 (commencing with Section 30025) of Division 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(i) The Office of Youth and Community Restoration shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for all employees, prospective employees, contractors, subcontractors, and volunteers requiring direct contact with young people in juvenile facilities or access to criminal offender record information, as defined by Section 11075 of the Penal Code, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- or federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 385, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 13.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2200.2.

(a) If the office of the ombudsperson decides to investigate a complaint, or refer a complaint to another body for investigation, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 2200, the ombudsperson shall notify the complainant in writing of the intention to investigate or refer the complaint. If the ombudsperson declines to investigate a complaint or continue an investigation, the ombudsperson shall notify the complainant in writing of the reason.

(b) The ombudsperson shall update the complainant on the progress of the investigation and the attempts to resolve the complaint, and notify the complainant in writing of the final outcome. If appropriate, the office may also
 share the outcome of any investigation performed by the office with the youth’s counsel.

(c) Except when there is a safety concern, the ombudsperson shall also notify the head of the agency against which a complaint was filed when it refers the matter for an investigation.

(d) The ombudsperson may resolve complaints, when possible, collaborating with facility administrators and staff to develop resolutions that may include training.

(e) The ombudsperson may recommend changes to improve services or to correct systemic issues. 

(f) (1) Information obtained by the office related to a complaint, regardless of whether it is investigated by the
 office, referred to another entity for investigation, or determined not to be the proper subject of an investigation, shall remain confidential under relevant state and federal confidentiality laws. Disclosure of information that is not confidential under state and federal confidentiality laws shall occur only as necessary to carry out the mission of the office, including as necessary to provide explanation and support for the office’s recommendations for improving the youth and community restoration system to the Legislature and state and local agencies that provide services and supports to youth placed in delinquency settings.

(2) The ombudsperson shall maintain confidentiality with respect to the identities of the complainants or witnesses coming before them, except insofar as disclosure may be necessary to enable the
 ombudsperson to carry out the duties of the office set forth in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive. The ombudsperson may not disclose a record that is confidential under relevant state and federal confidentiality laws.

(3) The ombudsperson shall advise all complainants that retaliation is not permitted and constitutes the basis for filing a subsequent complaint. 

(g) In order to encourage candor during the ombudsperson’s investigation of complaints made by, or on behalf of, detained youths and to facilitate the ombudsperson’s ability to resolve complaints, both of the following shall apply:

(1) The ombudsperson and their staff shall not be compelled to testify or be deposed in a judicial or administrative
 proceeding regarding matters coming to their attention in the exercise of their official duties, except as necessary to enforce or implement this chapter.

(2) The records of the ombudsperson and their staff, including notes, drafts, and records obtained from an individual or agency during the intake, review, or investigation of a complaint, and any reports not released to the public shall not be subject to disclosure or production in response to a subpoena or discovery in a judicial or administrative proceeding, except as necessary to enforce or implement the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 528, Sec. 7.   (AB 505)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2200.5.

(a) The ombudsperson shall publish and provide regular reports to the Legislature about all data collected over the course of the year, including, but not limited to, contacts to the office, reports on chronic absenteeism, complaints received, including the type and source of those complaints, investigations performed by the ombudsperson, the time to investigate and resolve complaints, the number and types of complaints referred to other agencies, the trends and issues that arose in the course of investigating complaints, pending complaints, and subsequent findings and actions taken, and a summary of the data received by the ombudsperson. Data shall be disaggregated by gender, sexual orientation, race, and ethnicity of the complainants to the extent this information is available.

(b) The ombudsperson shall include recommendations consistent with this data for improving the juvenile justice system.

(c) The compiled data and recommendations shall be posted so that it is available to the public on the office’s existing internet website.

(d) The report shall comply with all confidentiality laws.

(e) Nothing shall preclude the ombudsperson from issuing data, findings, or reports other than the annual compilation of data described in this section or Section 2200.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 385, Sec. 3.   (AB 2176)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2200.7.

(a) The office shall hire the necessary personnel to perform the functions of the ombudsperson. In hiring decisions, priority shall be given to people who were formerly detained or committed to a juvenile justice facility.

(b) When exercising the investigative, complaint resolution, and technical assistance functions of the ombudsperson of the Office of Youth and Community Restoration, the ombudsperson and their staff shall have all immunities under Article 2 (commencing with Section 815) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code afforded to the discharge of discretionary duties by public entities and their employees.

(c) If the ombudsperson
 believes, based on information received during the exercise of their official duties, that there is a breach of duty or misconduct by an employee of a state or local agency or their contractors in the conduct of the employees’ official duties, the ombudsperson shall refer the matter to the agency director or other responsible officer, and, if the conduct would constitute a crime, to an appropriate law enforcement body or agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 31.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2201.

(a) Until July 1, 2023, the committee established pursuant to Section 12824 of the Government Code shall be responsible for advising and providing recommendations related to policies, programs, and approaches that improve youth outcomes, reduce youth detention, and reduce recidivism for the population in subdivision (b) of Section 1990.

(b) The committee established pursuant to Section 12824 of the Government Code shall work directly with the Office of Youth and Community Restoration, the Division of Juvenile Justice, and shall be staffed by the California Health and Human Services Agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 337, Sec. 50.   (SB 823)   Effective September 30, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2202.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2024, the Office of Youth and Community Restoration shall act as the designated state agency pursuant to the federal Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018 (34 U.S.C. Sec. 11101 et seq.) and subsequent reauthorizations.

(b) The office shall do all of the following:

(1) Carry out all grant administration functions, such as the annual review and approval, or review, revision, and approval, of the comprehensive state plan for the improvement of juvenile justice and delinquency prevention activities throughout the state.

(2) Establish priorities for the use of funds as are available pursuant to the
 federal Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018 (34 U.S.C. Sec. 11101 et seq.) and subsequent reauthorizations.

(3) Approve the expenditure of all funds, provided that the approval of those expenditures may be granted to single projects or to groups of projects.

(c) In accordance with the federal Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018 (34 U.S.C. Sec. 11101 et seq.) and subsequent reauthorizations, the office shall inspect and collect relevant data from any secure facility that may be used for the secure detention of juveniles.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 50, Sec. 17.   (AB 169)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3. NARCOTIC ADDICTS [3200. - 3313.]



CHAPTER 1. Fentanyl Program Grants [3200. - 3203.]

3200.

(a) The State Department of Public Health shall establish a grant program to reduce fentanyl overdoses and use throughout the state. Six one-time grants shall be made; two in northern California, two in the central valley, and two in southern California.

(b) Grant moneys may be used for any of the following purposes:

(1) Education programs in local schools.

(2) Increasing testing abilities for
 fentanyl.

(3) Overdose prevention and recovery programs, including making naloxone or other overdose recovery drugs more available in the community.

(4) Increasing social services and substance use recovery services to those addicted to fentanyl or other opioids.

(c) A local jurisdiction or agency, or a group comprised of local jurisdictions and agencies working in concert, shall submit an application and plan to the department in a form required by the
 department. The department
 shall award grants based on need, evidence-based likelihood of success, and the number of people proposed to be served.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 62.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Sec. 3203.)
-------------------------------------------

3201.

(a) As a condition of receiving a grant pursuant to this chapter, the applying entity shall agree to provide the department with information on the program, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) How the grant moneys were used.

(2) The number of people served.

(3) All of the following for both the year prior to the grant and the
 years the grant was used:

(A) The number of hospitalizations due to fentanyl.

(B) The number of overdoses from fentanyl.

(C) The number of overdose deaths from fentanyl.

(4) Any other information the department requires.

(b) (1) On or before January 1, 2026, the
 department shall submit
 an interim report on the progress
 of the programs for which grants were provided to the Legislature and the Governor’s office, including, but not limited to, all available information provided by the programs pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) On or before January 1, 2028, the department shall submit a final report on the efficacy of the programs for which grants were provided to the Legislature and the Governor’s office, including, but not limited to, all of the information provided by the programs pursuant to subdivision (a).

(3) Reports submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 63.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Sec. 3203.)
-------------------------------------------

3202.

This chapter shall be implemented only to the extent that funds are appropriated for this purpose in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 783, Sec. 1.   (AB 2365)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Sec. 3203.)
-------------------------------------------

3203.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 64.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 1, commencing with Section 3200.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. California Rehabilitation Center [3300. - 3313.]

3300.

There is hereby established an institution and branches, under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, to be known as the California Rehabilitation Center. Branches may be established in existing institutions of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Adult Operations, in halfway houses as described in Section 3153, in such other facilities as may be made available on the grounds of other state institutions, and in city and county correctional facilities where treatment facilities are available. Branches shall not be established on the grounds of such other institutions in any manner which will result in the placement of patients of such institutions into inferior facilities. Branches placed in a facility of the State
 Department of State Hospitals shall have prior approval of the Director of State Hospitals, and branches placed in a facility of the State Department of Developmental Services shall have the prior approval of the Director of Developmental Services. Commencing July 1, 2005, the branches in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities shall be established by order of the secretary, and shall be subject to his or her administrative direction. Branches placed in city or county facilities shall have prior approval of the legislative body of the city or county.

Persons confined pursuant to this section in branches established in city and county correctional facilities shall be housed separately from the prisoners therein, and shall be entitled to receive treatment substantially equal to that which would be afforded those persons if confined in the main institution of the California Rehabilitation
 Center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 62.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3301.

The principal purpose of the California Rehabilitation Center shall be the receiving, control, confinement, employment, education, treatment and rehabilitation of persons under the custody of the Department of Corrections or any agency thereof who are addicted to the use of narcotics or are in imminent danger of becoming so addicted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1226.)
-------------------------------------------

3302.

The Director of Corrections shall acquire, or construct, and equip, in accordance with law, suitable buildings, structures and facilities for the California Rehabilitation Center.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1226.)
-------------------------------------------

3303.

(a) The Director of Corrections may prescribe and amend rules and regulations for the administration of the California Rehabilitation Center. These rules and regulations shall be promulgated and filed pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and shall, to the extent practical, be stated in language that is easily understood by the general public.

(b) The director shall maintain, publish, and make available to the general public, a compendium of the rules and regulations promulgated by the director pursuant to this section.

(c) The following exceptions to the procedures specified in this section apply to the rules and regulations made by the director for the California Rehabilitation Center:

(1) The director may specify an effective date that is any time more than 30 days after the rule or regulation is filed with the Secretary of State; provided that no less than 20 days prior to that effective date, copies of the rule or regulation shall be posted in conspicuous places throughout each institution and shall be mailed to all persons or organizations who request them.

(2) The director may rely upon a summary of the information compiled by a hearing officer; provided that the summary and the testimony taken regarding the proposed action shall be retained as part of the public record for at least one year after the adoption, amendment, or repeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 172.)
-------------------------------------------

3304.

A warden shall be appointed for the California Rehabilitation Center pursuant to Section 6050 of the Penal Code, and the Director of Corrections shall appoint, subject to civil service, such other officers and employees as may be necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1420, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

3305.

The supervision, management and control of the California Rehabilitation Center and the responsibility for the care, custody, training, discipline, employment, and treatment of the persons confined in the center are vested in the Director of Corrections. Part 3 (commencing with Section 1999) of the Penal Code applies to the institution as a prison under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and to the persons confined in the institution insofar as those provisions may be applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 173.)
-------------------------------------------

3306.

The Director of Corrections may authorize the temporary removal from the California Rehabilitation Center or any of its branches under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections of any person confined therein. The director may require that such temporary removal be under custody. Unless the person is removed for medical treatment, the removal shall not be for a period longer than three days. The director may require the person to reimburse the state, in whole or in part, for expenses incurred by the state in connection with such temporary removal other than for medical treatment.

Under specific regulations established by the director for the selection of confined persons, the director may authorize assignment to conservation camp programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1124.)
-------------------------------------------

3307.

The Director of Corrections may establish and operate facilities to be known as community correctional centers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1124.)
-------------------------------------------

3308.

The primary purpose of such facilities is to provide housing, supervision, counseling, and other correctional programs for persons committed to the Director of Corrections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1124.)
-------------------------------------------

3309.

Commencing July 1, 2005, the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall make rules and regulations for the government of the community correctional centers in the management of their affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 10, Sec. 97.   Effective May 10, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 99 of Ch. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

3310.

The Director of Corrections may transfer persons confined in the California Rehabilitation Center, or branches thereof, to community correctional centers and place persons on outpatient status in community correctional centers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1124.)
-------------------------------------------

3311.

The Director of Corrections may grant furloughs to residents of community correctional centers for the purpose of employment, education, including vocational training, or arranging a suitable employment and residence program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1124.)
-------------------------------------------

3313.

(a) The Department of Finance and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall release a report that provides an updated comprehensive plan for the state prison system, including a permanent solution to the decaying infrastructure of the California Rehabilitation Center. The report shall be submitted with the Governor’s 2016–17 Budget to the Assembly Committee on Appropriations, the Assembly Committee on Budget, the Senate Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that given the reduction in the prison population, further investment in building additional prisons is unnecessary at this time, and that the California
 Rehabilitation Center may be closed without jeopardizing the court-ordered prison population cap.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 26, Sec. 43.   (SB 85)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3.5. CALIFORNIA HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES AGENCY DEPARTMENTS: PUBLIC NOTICE REQUIREMENTS [3500. - 3500.]

3500.

If a department within the California Health and Human Services Agency has received approval of an operational state plan by a federal agency, or has applied and has been approved for a waiver from a federal law or federal regulation, the department shall make any and all approved plans and waivers available to the public by publishing a hyperlink to that information on the homepage of the department’s Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   (AB 294)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4. MENTAL HEALTH [4000. - 4390.]



PART 1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION, POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE DEPARTMENT [4000. - 4098.5.]



  CHAPTER 1. General [4000. - 4027.]

4000.

There is in the California Health and Human Services Agency a State Department of State Hospitals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 63.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4001.

As used in this division “state hospital” means any hospital specified in Section 4100.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 64.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4004.

The department is under the control of an executive officer known as the Director of State Hospitals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 65.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4005.

With the consent of the Senate, the Governor shall appoint, to serve at his or her pleasure, the Director of State Hospitals. He or she shall have the powers of a head of a department pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11150), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code, and shall receive the salary provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code.

Upon recommendation of the director, the Governor may appoint a chief deputy director of the department who shall hold office at the pleasure of the Governor. The salary of the chief deputy director shall be fixed in accordance with law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 66.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4005.1.

The State Department of State Hospitals, the State Department of Health Care Services, and the State Department of Social Services may adopt and enforce rules and regulations necessary to carry out their respective duties under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 42.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4005.4.

All regulations heretofore adopted by the State Department of Health pursuant to authority now vested in the State Department of Mental Health by Section 4005.1 and in effect immediately preceding the operative date of this section, shall remain in effect and shall be fully enforceable unless and until readopted, amended or repealed by the Director of Mental Health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

4005.5.

All regulations relating to state hospitals previously adopted by the State Department of Mental Health pursuant to authority now vested in the State Department of State Hospitals by Section 4005.1 and in effect immediately preceding the operative date of this section, shall remain in effect and shall be fully enforceable unless and until readopted, amended, or repealed by the Director of State Hospitals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 67.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4005.6.

All regulations heretofore adopted by the State Department of Mental Health pursuant to authority vested in the State Department of Health Care Services by Section 4005.1 and in effect immediately preceding the operative date of the act that added this section shall remain in effect and shall be fully enforceable unless and until readopted, amended, or repealed by the Director of Health Care Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 43.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4005.7.

All regulations heretofore adopted by the State Department of Mental Health, and its successor, pursuant to authority vested in the State Department of Health Care Services by Section 4005.1 and in effect immediately preceding the operative date of the act that amended this section in the first year of the 2013–14 Regular Session shall remain in effect and shall be fully enforceable unless and until readopted, amended, or repealed by the Director of Health Care Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 29.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4005.8.
